New York, session 2025-2026, S4410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 27-1007 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by section 4 of part SS of chapter 59 of the 3 laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 4 6. In addition to the refund value of a beverage container as estab- 5 lished by section 27-1005 of this title, a deposit initiator shall pay 6 to any dealer or operator of a redemption center a handling fee of 7 [three and one-half] four and one-half cents for each beverage container 8 accepted by the deposit initiator from such dealer or operator of a 9 redemption center. Payment of the handling fee shall be as compensation 10 for collecting, sorting and packaging of empty beverage containers for 11 transport back to the deposit initiator or its designee. Payment of the 12 handling fee may not be conditioned on the purchase of any goods or 13 services, nor may such payment be made out of the refund value account 14 established pursuant to section 27-1012 of this title. A distributor who 15 does not initiate deposits on a type of beverage container is considered 16 a dealer only for the purpose of receiving a handling fee from a deposit 17 initiator. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 19 deemed repealed December 31, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08664-01-5